Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Cross references. —

As to service of process on nonresident motorists and motorists not servable in state, see §

1-6-301

.

As to right-of-way for troops, see §

19-9-208

.

As to use of vehicles for hunting or fishing, see §

23-3-306

.

As to highways generally, see title 24.

Revision of title. —

Laws 1984, ch. 47, §§ 1 to 3, and Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1 revised this title.

Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 1, amended and renumbered former §§

31-2-101

through

31-2-104

as present §§

24-12-101

through

24-12-103

. Section 2 of that act renumbered former §§

31-3-101

through 31-3-120 as present §§

9-3-601

through

9-3-620

, and former § 31-4-106 as former §

39-2-305

(now

31-2-508

). Section 3 of that act repealed and recreated former §§

31-1-101

through 31-1-106,

31-4-101

through

31-4-105

, and 31-4-107 through 31-4-1109 as present §§

31-1-101

through

31-4-104

.

Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1 amended and renumbered former §§

31-5-101

through

31-5-232

,

31-5-301

through

31-5-970

,

31-5-1101

through

31-5-1214

, and

31-10-101

through 31-17-102 as present §§

31-5-101

through

31-5-232

,

31-5-301

through

31-5-970

,

31-5-1101

through

31-5-1111

, and

31-10-101

through

31-18-902

, respectively.

In addition, §

31-7-139

was added by Laws 1984, ch. 41, § 1, and various sections in this title were amended by Laws 1984, chs. 2, 4, 41 and 46. Where there were conflicts between these amendments and the revision of this title by Laws 1984, chs. 47 and 48, the sections are set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

Sections in this title which were unaffected by any 1984 legislation are former §§

31-5-1003

, 31-5-1005 and

31-5-1006

(present §§

31-18-803

,

31-18-805

and

31-18-806

), and §§

31-6-101

through

31-7-101

,

31-7-103

through

31-7-124

,

31-7-128

,

31-7-129

,

31-7-131

through

31-7-138

, and

31-8-101

through

31-9-414

.

Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2, revised chapters 6 through 9 of this title, amending and renumbering former §§

31-6-101

through

31-9-414

as present §§

31-6-101

through

31-9-414

.

In addition, various sections in chapters 6 through 9 were amended by Laws 1985, chs. 20, 40, 107 and 211. Where there were conflicts between these amendments and the revision of this title, the sections are set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 3, reads: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

No detailed explanation of the changes made by the 1984 and 1985 acts has been attempted, but, where appropriate, historical citations to former provisions have been added to corresponding sections, and annotations to cases decided under former provisions have been placed under comparable sections where it was felt they would be useful. For tables of revised and renumbered sections, see Volume 11 of the Wyoming Statutes Annotated.